Hawaii statutes.
§84-2 Applicability. This chapter
shall apply to every nominated, appointed, or elected officer, employee, and
candidate to elected office of the State and for election to the constitutional
convention, but excluding justices and judges; provided that in the case of
elected delegates and employees of the constitutional convention, this chapter
shall apply only to the enforcement and administration of the code of ethics
adopted by the constitutional convention. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L 1979,
c 91, §3]

Case Notes

Commission has no jurisdiction to continue with charges
against employee after employee resigns. 53 H. 373, 494 P.2d 559.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next